Nevada, session 83, AB373.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 76.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.100 1. A person shall not conduct a business in this State
unless and until the person obtains a state business license issued by
the Secretary of State. If the person is:
-
*AB373*

– 2 –
(a) An entity required to file an initial or annual list with the
Secretary of State pursuant to this title, the person must obtain the
state business license at the time of filing the initial or annual list.
(b) Not an entity required to file an initial or annual list with the
Secretary of State pursuant to this title, the person must obtain the
state business license before conducting a business in this State.
2. An application for a state business license must:
(a) Be made upon a form prescribed by the Secretary of State;
(b) Set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or
intends to transact business, or if the applicant is an entity organized
pursuant to this title and on file with the Secretary of State, the exact
name on file with the Secretary of State, the business identification
number as assigned by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
225.082, and the location in this State of the place or places of
business;
(c) Be accompanied by a fee in the amount of $200, except that
if the applicant is [a] :
(1) A limited-liability company whose original articles of
organization include an initial manager or member who has
received unemployment compensation within the 7 days
immediately preceding the date of the filing of the articles of
organization, a fee of $25; or
(2) A corporation organized pursuant to chapter 78, 78A or
78B of NRS, or a foreign corporation required to file an initial or
annual list with the Secretary of State pursuant to chapter 80 of
NRS, [the application must be accompanied by] a fee of $500; and
(d) Include any other information that the Secretary of State
deems necessary.
 If the applicant is an entity organized pursuant to this title and on
file with the Secretary of State and the applicant has no location in
this State of its place of business, the address of its registered agent
shall be deemed to be the location in this State of its place of
business.
3. The application must be signed pursuant to NRS 239.330 by:
(a) The owner of a business that is owned by a natural person.
(b) A member or partner of an association or partnership.
(c) A general partner of a limited partnership.
(d) A managing partner of a limited-liability partnership.
(e) A manager or managing member of a limited-liability
company.
(f) An officer of a corporation or some other person specifically
authorized by the corporation to sign the application.
4. If the application for a state business license is defective in
any respect or the fee required by this section is not paid, the
-
*AB373*

– 3 –
Secretary of State may return the application for correction or
payment.
5. A state business license issued pursuant to this section must
contain the business identification number assigned by the Secretary
of State pursuant to NRS 225.082.
6. The state business license required to be obtained pursuant
to this section is in addition to any license to conduct business that
must be obtained from the local jurisdiction in which the business is
being conducted.
7. For the purposes of this chapter, a person:
(a) Shall be deemed to conduct a business in this State if a
business for which the person is responsible:
(1) Is organized pursuant to this title, other than a business
organized pursuant to:
(I) Chapter 82 or 84 of NRS; or
(II) Chapter 81 of NRS if the business is a nonprofit unit-
owners’ association or a nonprofit religious, charitable, fraternal or
other organization that qualifies as a tax-exempt organization
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c);
(2) Has an office or other base of operations in this State;
(3) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 76.103, has a
registered agent in this State; or
(4) Pays wages or other remuneration to a natural person
who performs in this State any of the duties for which he or she is
paid.
(b) Shall be deemed not to conduct a business in this State if:
(1) The business for which the person is responsible:
(I) Is not organized pursuant to this title;
(II) Does not have an office or base of operations in this
State;
(III) Does not have a registered agent in this State; and
(IV) Does not pay wages or other remuneration to a
natural person who performs in this State any of the duties for which
he or she is paid, other than wages or other remuneration paid to a
natural person for performing duties in connection with an activity
described in subparagraph (2);
(2) The business for which the person is responsible is
conducting activity in this State solely to provide vehicles or
equipment on a short-term basis in response to a wildland fire, a
flood, an earthquake or another emergency; or
(3) The Secretary of State determines that the person is not
conducting a business in this State.
8. As used in this section, “registered agent” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 77.230.
-
*AB373*

– 4 –
Sec. 2. NRS 86.263 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.263 1. A limited-liability company shall, at the time of the
filing of its articles of organization with the Secretary of State, or, if
the limited-liability company has selected an alternative due date
pursuant to subsection 12, on or before that alternative due date, file
with the Secretary of State, on a form furnished by the Secretary of
State, a list that contains:
(a) The name of the limited-liability company;
(b) The file number of the limited-liability company, if known;
(c) The names and titles of all of its managers or, if there is no
manager, all of its managing members;
(d) The address, either residence or business, of each manager or
managing member listed, following the name of the manager or
managing member; and
(e) The signature of a manager or managing member of the
limited-liability company, or some other person specifically
authorized by the limited-liability company to sign the list,
certifying that the list is true, complete and accurate.
2. The limited-liability company shall thereafter, on or before
the last day of the month in which the anniversary date of its
organization occurs, or, if, pursuant to subsection 12, the limited-
liability company has selected an alternative due date for filing the
list required by subsection 1, on or before the last day of the month
in which the anniversary date of the alternative due date occurs in
each year, file with the Secretary of State, on a form furnished by
the Secretary of State, an annual list containing all of the
information required in subsection 1.
3. Each list required by subsections 1 and 2 must be
accompanied by a declaration under penalty of perjury that:
(a) The limited-liability company has complied with the
provisions of chapter 76 of NRS;
(b) The limited-liability company acknowledges that pursuant to
NRS 239.330, it is a category C felony to knowingly offer any false
or forged instrument for filing in the Office of the Secretary of
State; and
(c) None of the managers or managing members identified in the
list has been identified in the list with the fraudulent intent of
concealing the identity of any person or persons exercising the
power or authority of a manager or managing member in
furtherance of any unlawful conduct.
4. Upon filing:
(a) The initial list required by subsection 1, the limited-liability
company shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150 [.] , except
that if an initial member or manager included in the original
articles of organization has received unemployment compensation
-
*AB373*

– 5 –
within the 7 days immediately preceding the date of the filing of
the articles of organization, a fee of $25.
(b) Each annual list required by subsection 2, the limited-
liability company shall pay to the Secretary of State a fee of $150.
5. If a limited-liability company files an amended list of
managers and managing members with the Secretary of State within
60 days after the date on which the initial list required by subsection
1 is filed, the limited-liability company or the resigning manager or
managing member is not required to pay a fee for filing the
amended list.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, if a manager
or managing member of a limited-liability company resigns and the
resignation is not reflected on the annual or amended list of
managers and managing members, the limited-liability company or
the resigning manager or managing member shall pay to the
Secretary of State a fee of $75 to file the resignation.
7. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing each list required by subsection 2, provide to each limited-
liability company which is required to comply with the provisions of
this section, and which has not become delinquent, a notice of the
fee due under subsection 4 and a reminder to file the list required by
subsection 2. Failure of any company to receive a notice does not
excuse it from the penalty imposed by law.
8. If the list to be filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 or 2 is defective or the fee required by subsection 4 is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the list for correction or payment.
9. An annual list for a limited-liability company not in default
received by the Secretary of State more than 90 days before its due
date shall be deemed an amended list for the previous year.
10. A person who files with the Secretary of State a list
required by subsection 1 or 2 which identifies a manager or
managing member with the fraudulent intent of concealing the
identity of any person or persons exercising the power or authority
of a manager or managing member in furtherance of any unlawful
conduct is subject to the penalty set forth in NRS 225.084.
11. For the purposes of this section, a member is not deemed to
exercise actual control of the daily operations of a limited-liability
company based solely on the fact that the member has voting control
of the limited-liability company.
12. The Secretary of State may allow a limited-liability
company to select an alternative due date for filing the list required
by subsection 1.
13. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to administer
the provisions of subsection 12.
-
*AB373*

– 6 –
Sec. 3. NRS 86.561 is hereby amended to read as follows:
86.561 1. The Secretary of State shall charge and collect for:
(a) Filing the original articles of organization, or for registration
of a foreign company, $75 [;] , except that if an initial member or
manager included in the original articles of organization has
received unemployment compensation within the 7 days
immediately preceding the date of the filing of the articles of
organization, $25;
(b) Amending or restating the articles of organization, amending
the registration of a foreign company or filing a certificate of
correction, $175;
(c) Filing the articles of dissolution of a domestic or foreign
company, [$100;] $25;
(d) Certifying a copy of articles of organization or an
amendment to the articles, $30;
(e) Certifying an authorized printed copy of this chapter, $30;
(f) Reserving a name for a limited-liability company, $25;
(g) Filing a certificate of cancellation, $100;
(h) Signing, filing or certifying any other record, $50; and
(i) Copies provided by the Office of the Secretary of State, $2
per page.
2. The Secretary of State shall charge and collect, at the time of
any service of process on the Secretary of State as agent for service
of process of a limited-liability company, $100 which may be
recovered as taxable costs by the party to the action causing the
service to be made if the party prevails in the action.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the fees set
forth in NRS 78.785 apply to this chapter.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB373*